Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
PART 2
R

EGIONAL SOLID WASTE MANAGEMENT AUTHORITIES

12-8-50. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the "Regional Solid Waste Management Authorities Act."

(Code 1981, §

12-8-50

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 412, § 1.)

12-8-51. Authority for enactment; nonprofit and public purposes of authorities; tax exemption; state policy; unfair competition with private sector prohibited.

This part is enacted pursuant to authority granted to the General Assembly by the Constitution of Georgia. Each authority created by this part is created for nonprofit and public purposes; and it is found, determined, and declared that the creation of each such authority and the carrying out of its corporate purposes is in all respects for the benefit of the people of this state and that the authority is an institution of purely public charity and will be performing an essential governmental function in the exercise of the power conferred upon it by this part. For such reasons, the state covenants from time to time with the holders of the bonds issued under this part that such authority shall be required to pay no taxes or assessments imposed by the state or any of its counties, municipal corporations, political subdivisions, or taxing districts upon any property acquired by the authority or under its jurisdiction, control, possession, or supervision or leased by it to others; or upon its activities in the operation or maintenance of any such property; or upon any income derived by the authority in the form of fees, recording fees, rentals, charges, purchase price, installments, or otherwise; and that the bonds of such authority, their transfer, and the income therefrom shall at all times be exempt from taxation within the state. The tax exemption provided in this Code section shall not include any exemption from sales and use tax on property purchased by the authority or for use by the authority.

It is the express policy of the State of Georgia that any authority created by this part shall be authorized with respect to any solid waste which the generator thereof, county, or municipal corporation makes available to such authority to enter into agreements in furtherance of a project granting, directing, or providing for an exclusive right or rights in any authority with respect to such solid waste, including, but not limited to, the exclusive right to collect, acquire, receive, transport, store, treat, process, utilize, sell, or dispose of discarded solid waste; provided, however, no authority created by this part and no county or municipal corporation or other governmental body shall have the right to enter into agreements or to enact ordinances or resolutions providing for any rights with respect to recovered materials or substances, materials, or resources contained in solid waste as may be separated for recycling, use, or reuse at any time prior to pickup by or delivery to any authority, county, municipal corporation, or persons under contract with such authority, county, or municipal corporation.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, no authority shall compete unfairly with the private sector by purchasing or offering to purchase recovered materials at prices higher than the highest prevailing market prices in the county in which the purchase is made for recovered materials of like grade and quality.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-51

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 412, § 1.)

12-8-52. Definitions.

As used in this part, the term:

"Authority" means each public corporation created pursuant to this part.

"Collection" means the aggregating of solid waste from its primary source and includes all activities up to such time as the waste is delivered to the place at which it is to be processed.

"Cost of project" means all costs of site preparation and other start-up costs; all costs of construction; all costs of real and personal property required for the purposes of the project and facilities related thereto, including land and any rights or undivided interest therein, easements, franchises, fees, permits, approvals, licenses, and certificates and the securing of such permits, approvals, licenses, and certificates and all machinery and equipment, including motor vehicles which are used for project functions; financing charges and interest prior to and during construction and during such additional period as the authority may reasonably determine to be necessary for the placing of the project in operation; costs of engineering, architectural, and legal services; cost of plans and specifications and all expenses necessary or incident to determining the feasibility or practicability of the project; administrative expenses; and such other expenses as may be necessary or incidental to the financing authorized in this part. The costs of any project may also include funds for the creation of a debt service reserve, a renewal and replacement reserve, and such other reserves as may be reasonably required by the authority for the operation of its projects and as may be authorized by any bond resolution or trust agreement or indenture pursuant to the provisions of which the issuance of any such bonds may be authorized. Any obligation or expense incurred for any of the foregoing purposes shall be regarded as a part of the costs of the project and may be paid or reimbursed as such out of the proceeds of user fees, of revenue bonds or notes issued under this part for such project, or from other revenues obtained by the authority.

"County" means any county of this state or a governmental entity formed by the consolidation of a county and one or more municipal corporations.

"Governing body" means the elected or duly appointed officials constituting the governing body of each municipal corporation and county in the state.

"Municipal corporation" means any city or town in this state.

"Project" means:

The collection, transportation, and management of solid waste and shall also mean any property, real or personal, used as or in connection with a facility for the composting, extraction, collection, storage, treatment, processing, utilization, or final disposal of resources contained in solid waste, including the conversion of solid waste or resources contained therein into compost, oil, charcoal, gas, or any other product or energy source and the collection, storage, treatment, utilization, processing, or final disposal of solid waste in connection with the foregoing; and

Any property, real or personal, used as or in connection with a facility for the composting, extraction, collection, storage, treatment, processing, or utilization of water resources and the conversion of such resources into any compost or useful form of energy.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-52

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 412, § 1.)

12-8-53. Creation of authorities.

There is created in and for each county and municipal corporation in this state a public body corporate and politic, to be known as the "solid waste management authority" of such county or municipal corporation. No authority shall transact any business or exercise any powers under this part until the governing body of the county by proper resolution of its board of commissioners, or, if a municipal corporation, by proper ordinance or resolution of its council, declares that there is a need for an authority to function in the county or municipal corporation.

Any two or more counties or municipal corporations or a combination thereof may jointly form an authority, to be known as the "regional solid waste management authority" for such counties and municipal corporations. No authority shall transact any business or exercise any powers under this part until the governing authorities of the units of local government involved declare, by ordinance or resolution, that there is a need for an authority to function and until the governing authorities authorize the chief elected official of the unit of local government to enter into an agreement with the other units of local government for the activation of an authority and such agreement is executed.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-53

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 412, § 1.)

12-8-54. Board of directors.

Control and management of the authority shall be vested in a board of at least five directors who shall be residents of the county or municipal corporation which is a member of the authority. At least three of such directors shall be elected officials of the county or municipal corporation which is a member of the authority. The directors shall serve at the pleasure of the governing authority of the county or municipal corporation. Directors shall be appointed, and may be reappointed, for terms of four years. In the case of a regional solid waste management authority, each unit of local government participating in the authority shall appoint two members, with an additional member to be appointed by the directors themselves; provided, however, that if each participating municipal corporation which is within a participating county shall agree and, if authorized by an agreement among political subdivisions activating the authority, such participating county and participating municipal corporations may join in appointing their members to the authority and may agree to appoint as many as two members per participating municipal corporation within a county and, if the county is participating, two members for the county or as few as one member per county; provided, further, that in any case, an additional member shall be appointed by the directors of the authority themselves. The directors shall elect one of their members as chairman and another as vice-chairman and shall also elect a secretary and a treasurer or a secretary-treasurer, either of whom may but need not be a director. The directors shall receive no compensation for their services but shall be reimbursed for their actual expenses incurred in the performance of their duties. The directors may make bylaws and regulations for the governing of the authority and the operation of projects and may delegate to one or more of the officers, agents, and employees of the authority such powers and duties as may be deemed necessary and proper.

Members of the board of directors of an authority formed pursuant to this Code section may agree that additional political subdivisions may become members of such authority subsequent to its formation upon an affirmative vote of two-thirds of the members of such board of directors under the terms imposed by agreement of two-thirds of the members of such board of directors.

Any political subdivision which has become a member of such authority pursuant to subsection (b) of Code Section

12-8-53

and has determined that it shall not enter into a mutual agreement with the other political subdivisions which are members of such authority for the financial support and administrative function of such authority may be removed from such authority subsequent to its formation upon an affirmative vote of two-thirds of those members of the board of directors of such authority representing political subdivisions which have determined to enter into such an agreement. Upon such removal, the membership of such board of directors shall be reconstituted according to the terms of the agreement creating such authority as though the removed member or members had never executed such agreement. Any political subdivision removed from an authority pursuant to this subsection may be restored to membership in the authority pursuant to the terms of subsection (b) of this Code section.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-54

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 412, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 3276, § 19; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1101, § 3.)

Administrative Rules and Regulations.

- Solid waste management, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Environmental Protection, Subject 391-3-4.

Law reviews.

-
For note on 1992 amendment of this Code section, see 9 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 199 (1992).

12-8-55. Quorum; majority vote requirement.

A majority of the directors shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business of the authority.
However, any action with respect to any project of the authority must be approved by the affirmative vote of not less than a majority of the directors.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-55

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 412, § 1.)

12-8-56. Powers of authority.

Each authority shall have all of the powers necessary or convenient to carry out and effectuate the purposes and provisions of this part, including, but without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the power:

To bring and defend actions;

To adopt and amend a corporate seal;

To acquire, construct, improve, or modify, to place into operation, and to operate or cause to be placed into operation and operated, either as owner of all or of any part in common with others, a project or projects within the county in which the authority is activated and, subject to execution of agreements with the appropriate political subdivisions affected, within other counties and to pay all or part of the cost of any such project or projects from the proceeds of revenue bonds of the authority or from any contribution or loans by persons, firms, or corporations or from any other contribution or user fees, all of which the authority is authorized to receive, accept, and use;

To acquire, in its own name, by purchase on such terms and conditions and in such manner as it may deem proper, by condemnation in accordance with any and all laws applicable to the condemnation of property for public use, or by gift, grant, lease, or otherwise, real property or rights and easements therein and franchises and personal property necessary or convenient for its corporate purposes, which purposes shall include, but shall not be limited to, the constructing or acquiring of a project; the improving, extending, adding to, reconstructing, renovating, or remodeling of any project or part thereof already constructed or acquired; or the demolition to make room for such project or any part thereof and to insure the same against any and all risks as such insurance may, from time to time, be available. The authority may also use such property and rent or lease the same to or from others or make contracts with respect to the use thereof or sell, lease, exchange, transfer, assign, pledge, or otherwise dispose of or grant options for any such property in any manner which the authority deems to the best advantage of itself and its purposes, provided that the powers to acquire, use, and dispose of property as set forth in this paragraph shall include the power to acquire, use, and dispose of any interest in such property, whether divided or undivided, which acquisition may result in the ownership of such property or any part thereof in common with any other party or parties, public or private. Title to any such property of the authority, however, shall be held by the authority exclusively for the benefit of the public;

To make contracts and leases and to execute all instruments necessary or convenient, including contracts for construction of projects and leases of projects or contracts with respect to the use of projects which it causes to be acquired or constructed, provided that all private persons, firms, and corporations, this state, and all political subdivisions, departments, instrumentalities, or agencies of the state or of local government are authorized to enter into contracts, leases, or agreements with the authority, upon such terms and for such purposes as they deem advisable; and, without limiting the generality of the above, authority is specifically granted to municipal corporations and counties and to the authority to enter into contracts, lease agreements, or other undertakings relative to the furnishing of project activities and facilities or either of them by the authority to such municipal corporations and counties and by such municipal corporations and counties to the authority for a term not exceeding 50 years;

To exercise any one or more of the powers, rights, and privileges conferred by this Code section either alone or jointly or in common with one or more other public or private parties. In any such exercise of such powers, rights, and privileges jointly or in common with others with respect to the construction, operation, and maintenance of project facilities, the authority may own an undivided interest in such facilities with any other party with which it may jointly or in common exercise the rights and privileges conferred by this part and may enter into an agreement or agreements with respect to any such project facility with the other party or parties participating therein; and such agreement may contain such terms, conditions, and provisions, consistent with this part, as the parties thereto shall deem to be in their best interests, including, but not limited to, provisions for the construction, operation, and maintenance of such project facility by any one or more party of the parties to such agreement, which party or parties shall be designated in or pursuant to such agreement as agent or agents on behalf of itself and one or more of the other parties thereto, or by such other means as may be determined by the parties thereto, and including provisions for a method or methods of determining and allocating, among or between the parties, costs of construction, operation, maintenance, renewals, replacements, improvements, and disposal with respect to such facility. In carrying out its functions and activities as such agent with respect to construction, operation, and maintenance of such a facility, such agent shall be governed by the laws and regulations applicable to such agent as a separate legal entity and not by any laws or regulations which may be applicable to any of the other participating parties; provided, however, the agent shall act for the benefit of the public. Notwithstanding anything contained in any other law to the contrary, pursuant to the terms of any such agreement, the authority may delegate its powers and duties with respect to the construction, operation, and maintenance of such facility to the party acting as agent; and all actions taken by such agent in accordance with the provisions of such agreement may be binding upon the authority without further action or approval of the authority;

To accept, receive, and administer gifts, grants, appropriations, and donations of money, materials, and property of any kind, including loans and grants from the United States, this state, a unit of local government, or any agency, department, authority, or instrumentality of any of the foregoing, upon such terms and conditions as the United States, this state, a unit of local government, or such agency, department, authority, or instrumentality shall impose; to administer trusts; and to sell, lease, transfer, convey, appropriate, and pledge any and all of its property and assets;

To do any and all things necessary or proper for the accomplishment of the objectives of this part and to exercise any power usually possessed by private corporations performing similar functions which is not in conflict with the Constitution and laws of this state, including the power to employ professional and administrative staff and personnel and to retain legal, engineering, fiscal, accounting, and other professional services; the power to purchase all kinds of insurance, including, without limitation, insurance against tort liability and against risks of damage to property; the power to borrow money for any of the corporate purposes of the authority; the power to indemnify and hold harmless any parties contracting with the authority or its agents from damage to persons or property; and the power to act as self-insurer with respect to any loss or liability; provided, however, that obligations of the authority other than revenue bonds, for which provision is made in this part, shall be payable from the general funds of the authority and shall not be a charge against any special fund allocated to the payment of revenue bonds;

To borrow money and issue its revenue bonds and bond anticipation notes from time to time and to use the proceeds thereof for the purpose of paying all or part of the cost of any project, including the cost of extending, adding to, or improving such project, or for the purpose of refunding any such bonds of the authority theretofore issued; and otherwise to carry out the purposes of this part and to pay all other costs of the authority incident to, or necessary and appropriate to, such purposes, including the providing of funds to be paid into any fund or funds to secure such bonds and notes, provided that all such bonds and notes shall be issued in accordance with the procedures and subject to the limitations set forth in Code Section 12-8-58; and

To fix rentals and other charges which any user shall pay to the authority for the use of the project or part or combination thereof, and to charge and collect the same, and to lease and make contracts with political subdivisions and agencies with respect to use of any part of the project. Such rentals and other charges shall be so fixed and adjusted with respect to the aggregate thereof from the project or any part thereof so as to provide a fund with other revenues of such project, if any, to pay the cost of maintaining, repairing, and operating the project, including reserves for extraordinary repairs and insurance, unless such cost shall be otherwise provided for, which costs shall be deemed to include the expenses incurred by the authority on account of the project for water, light, sewer, and other services furnished by other facilities at such project.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-56

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 412, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 4, § 12.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1991, the subsection designation "(a)" was deleted at the beginning of this Code section, since there was no subsection (b).

12-8-57. Limitation on liability of members, officers, or employees of authority.

Except for gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct, neither the members of the authority nor any officer or employee of the authority, acting on behalf thereof and while acting within the scope of his responsibilities, shall be subject to any liability resulting from:

The design, construction, ownership, maintenance, operation, or management of a project; or

The carrying out of any of the discretionary powers or duties expressly provided for in this part.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-57

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 412, § 1.)

12-8-58. Bonds or other obligations; limitations and procedures for issuance.

Subject to the limitations and procedures provided by this Code section, the obligations of any authority evidenced by bonds, bond anticipation notes, trust indentures, deeds to secure obligations, security agreements, or mortgages executed in connection therewith may contain such provisions not inconsistent with law as shall be determined by the board of directors of the authority. The authority, in such instruments, may provide for the pledging of all or any part of its revenues, income, or charges and for the mortgaging, encumbering, or conveying of all or any part of its real or personal property; may covenant against pledging any or all of its revenues, income, or charges; and may further provide for the disposition of proceeds realized from the sale of any bonds and bond anticipation notes, for the replacement of lost, destroyed, stolen, or mutilated bonds and notes, and for the payment and redemption of such bonds and notes. Similarly, subject to the limitations and procedures of this Code section, undertakings of any authority may prescribe the procedure by which bondholders and noteholders may enforce rights against the authority and provide for rights upon breach of any covenant, condition, or obligation of the authority. Bonds, resolutions, trust indentures, mortgages, or deeds to secure obligations executed by an authority and bond anticipation notes executed by an authority may contain such provisions not otherwise contrary to law as the authority shall deem necessary or desirable.

The proceeds derived from the sale of all bonds and bond anticipation notes issued by an authority shall be held and used for the ultimate purpose of paying, directly or indirectly as permitted in this part, all or part of the cost of any project, including the cost of extending, financing, adding to, or improving such project, or for the purpose of refunding any bond anticipation notes issued in accordance with this part or refunding any previously issued bonds of the authority.

All bonds and bond anticipation notes issued by an authority shall be revenue obligations of such authority and may be made payable out of any revenues or other receipts, funds, or moneys of the authority, subject only to any agreements with the holders of other bonds or bond anticipation notes or to particular security agreements pledging any particular revenues, receipts, funds, or moneys.

Issuance by an authority of one or more series of bonds or bond anticipation notes for one or more purposes shall not preclude it from issuing other bonds or notes in connection with the same project or with any other projects, but the proceeding wherein any subsequent bonds or bond anticipation notes shall be issued shall recognize and protect any prior pledge or mortgage made in any prior security agreement or made for any prior issue of bonds or bond anticipation notes, unless in the resolution authorizing such prior issue the right is expressly reserved to the authority to issue subsequent bonds or bond anticipation notes on a parity with such prior issue.

An authority shall have the power and is authorized, whenever revenue bonds of the authority have been validated as provided in this part, to issue, from time to time, its notes in anticipation of the issuance of such bonds as validated and to renew from time to time any such notes by the issuance of new notes, whether the notes to be renewed have or have not matured. The authority may issue notes only to provide funds which would otherwise be provided by the issuance of the bonds as validated. The notes may be authorized, sold, executed, and delivered in the same manner as bonds. As with its bonds, the authority may sell such notes at public or private sale. Any resolution or resolutions authorizing notes of the authority or any issue thereof may contain any provisions which the authority is authorized to include in any such resolution or resolutions; and the authority may include in any notes any terms, covenants, or conditions which it is authorized to include in any bonds. Validation of such bonds shall be a condition precedent to the issuance of the notes, but it shall not be required that such notes be judicially validated. Bond anticipation notes shall not be issued in an amount exceeding the par value of the bonds in anticipation of which they are to be issued.

The interest rate on or rates to be borne by any bonds, notes, or other obligations issued by the authority shall be fixed by the board of directors of the authority. Any limitations with respect to interest rates found in Article 3 of Chapter 82 of Title 36 or in the usury laws of this state shall not apply to obligations issued under this part.

All revenue bonds issued by an authority under this part will be issued and validated under and in accordance with Article 3 of Chapter 82 of Title 36, except as provided in subsection (f) of this Code section and except as specifically set forth below:

Revenue bonds issued by an authority may be in such form, either coupon or fully registered, or both coupon and fully registered, and may be subject to such exchangeability and transferability provisions as the bond resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds or any indenture or trust agreement may provide;

Revenue bonds shall bear a certificate of validation. The signature of the clerk of the superior court of the judicial circuit in which the issuing authority is located may be made on the certificate of validation of such bonds by facsimile or by manual execution, stating the date on which such bonds were validated; and such entry shall be original evidence of the fact of judgment and shall be received as original evidence in any court in this state; and

In lieu of specifying the rate or rates of interest which revenue bonds to be issued by an authority are to bear, the notice to the district attorney or the Attorney General and the notice to the public of the time, place, and date of the validation hearing may state that the bonds, when issued, will bear interest at a rate not exceeding a maximum per annum rate of interest specified in such notices or, in the event the bonds are to bear different rates of interest for different maturity dates, that none of such rates will exceed the maximum rate specified in the notices; provided, however, that nothing contained in this paragraph shall be construed as prohibiting or restricting the right of the authority to sell such bonds at a discount, even if in so doing the effective interest cost resulting therefrom would exceed the maximum per annum interest rate specified in such notices.

The term "cost of project" shall have the meaning prescribed in paragraph (3) of Code Section

12-8-52

whenever referred to in bond resolutions of an authority, bonds and bond anticipation notes issued by an authority, or notices and proceedings to validate such bonds.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-58

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 412, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 3276, § 20.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1990, "and" was substituted for "an" preceding "transferability" in paragraph (g)(1).

Law reviews.

-
For note on 1992 amendment of this Code section, see 9 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 199 (1992).

12-8-59. Bonds or other obligations not indebtedness of state or political subdivision.

No bonds or other obligations of and no indebtedness incurred by any authority shall constitute an indebtedness or obligation of the State of Georgia or of any county, municipal corporation, or political subdivision thereof, nor shall any act of any authority in any manner constitute or result in the creation of an indebtedness of this state or of any such county, municipal corporation, or political subdivision. However, provisions of this Code section shall not preclude counties, municipal corporations, or other political subdivisions from choosing to guarantee the bonds, indebtedness, or other obligations of a regional solid waste authority as part of its demonstration of adequate financial responsibility pursuant to this part.
All such bonds and obligations shall be payable solely from the revenues therein pledged to such payment, including pledged rentals, sales proceeds, insurance proceeds, and condemnation awards; and no holder or holders of any such bonds or obligation shall ever have the right to compel any exercise of the taxing power of this state or of any county, municipal corporation, or political subdivision thereof or to enforce the payment thereof against any property of the state or of any such county, municipal corporation, or political subdivision.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-59

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 412, § 1.)

12-8-59.1. Liberal construction of part; bonds not subject to other state law; other authorities.

This part shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes hereof. Sale or issuance of bonds by any authority shall not be subject to regulation under Chapter 5 of Title 10, the "Georgia Uniform Securities Act of 2008," or any other law.

A municipal corporation, a county, or any number of counties and municipal corporations shall have the right to activate any authority under this part, notwithstanding the existence of any other authority having similar powers or purposes within the county or municipal corporation created pursuant to any general law or amendment to the Constitution of this state. However, nothing in this part shall be construed as repealing, amending, superseding, or altering the organization of or abridging the powers of such authorities as are now in existence.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-59.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 412, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 381, § 10/SB 358.)

12-8-59.2. Resolutions or ordinances declaring functioning of previously activated authority unnecessary.

As used in this Code section, the term "project" shall mean any interest of the authority in a project as otherwise defined in this part.

The governing body of any unit of local government which has authorized the functioning of an authority pursuant to Code Section 12-8-53 may by proper resolution or ordinance declare that there is no need for such authority to function in the county or municipal corporation. Upon such declaration by all units of local government which previously authorized the activation of the authority and upon compliance by such units of local government with the provisions of subsection (c) of this Code section, the authority shall cease to transact any business or exercise any powers inconsistent with the winding up of its affairs.

No resolutions or ordinances of units of local government declaring the functioning of a previously activated authority to be unnecessary shall be of any force and effect until:

In the case of an authority having outstanding notes or bonds:

Said notes or bonds have been paid or retired according to their terms or acquired by such units of local government; or

Appropriate contractual arrangements have been made by such units of local government to lease or purchase the authority's projects, or to arrange to have the authority's projects leased or purchased by others, consistent with the terms of said notes or bonds on such terms as will together with any existing debt service reserves held by the authority provide for the payment of the principal and interest on said notes or bonds; and

Appropriate arrangements have been made by such units of local government, or in the case of authorities activated pursuant to subsection (b) of Code Section 12-8-53, appropriate contractual and other arrangements have been made by, among, and between all units of local government which previously authorized the activation of the authority:

To hold, operate, or dispose of all assets or projects of the authority in the case of the transfer of such assets and projects by the authority to such units of local government, but nothing in this Code section shall require the continued operation of any project by such units of local government;

To assume or satisfy, or arrange to have assumed or satisfied, all contracts, leases, agreements, or obligations previously entered into or incurred by the authority with respect to the acquisition or operation of such assets or projects, consistent with the terms thereof, other than notes or bonds, but nothing in this Code section shall require the renewal, continuation beyond its terms, or extension of any such contract, lease, agreement, or obligation; and

To make provision, by creation of a reserve fund or otherwise, for residual obligations which may from time to time arise during the period of winding up of the affairs of the authority pursuant to subsection (d) of this Code section; or

In the case of an authority having no outstanding notes or bonds, there has been compliance with the terms of subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of this subsection.

Upon compliance by all units of local government which previously authorized the activation of the authority with subsections (b) and (c) of this Code section, the board of directors of the authority shall cause to be transferred to such units of local government, at such a time and on such reasonable terms and conditions as may be agreed to between the authority and such units of local government and subject to the arrangements made under and the provisions of subsection (c) of this Code section, the assets, projects, contracts, leases, agreements, and obligations of the authority. The board of directors of any such authority shall take all steps necessary or convenient to carry out the provisions of this Code section consistent with the benefit of the public.

The board of directors of the authority shall continue in existence for a period of time sufficient for the orderly winding up of the affairs of the authority and, in the case of an authority having outstanding notes or bonds, for a reasonable period of time after such notes or bonds have been paid or retired and may exercise any power usually possessed by private corporations of this state in the process of winding up their affairs not in conflict with the Constitution or laws of this state. In the course of such winding up, the board of directors shall have access to any funds made available pursuant to division (c)(1)(C)(iii) of this Code section but shall exercise control over such funds as fiduciaries, shall disburse such funds only for purposes appropriate to the winding up of the affairs of the authority, and shall account for any remainder of such funds to the units of local government which authorized the activation of the authority.

Upon the completion of the process of winding up of the affairs of the authority, the board of directors shall relinquish control of any remaining funds made available pursuant to division (c)(1)(C)(iii) of this Code section to the units of local government which authorized the activation of the authority and by resolution dissolve itself, whereupon such authority shall become dormant but may be reactivated by compliance with Code Section

12-8-53

.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-59.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 447, § 3; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1081, § 5.)